Hawaii statutes.
§437-56 Reimbursement for parts. (a)
In no event shall any manufacturer or distributor pay its dealers a markup on
parts for warranty work that is less than that charged by the dealer to the
retail customers of the dealer; provided that such dealer's retail parts markup
is not unreasonable when compared with that of same line make authorized
franchise dealers of the manufacturer or distributor for identical merchandise
or services in the State.

(b) The retail markup charged by the dealer
shall be established by submitting to the manufacturer or distributor a
sufficient quantity of numerically consecutive repair orders from the most
recent months to provide one hundred qualifying customer-paid repair orders.
For a dealer unable to provide one hundred qualifying customer-paid repair
orders out of all numerically consecutive repair orders within the two-month
period prior to the submission, the dealer shall submit customer service repair
orders of all types, including customer pay, warranty, and internal, for that
two-month period. The repair orders shall contain the price and percentage
markup. Dealers shall declare in their submission the average markup the
dealer is declaring as its new parts reimbursement rate. The declared parts
reimbursement markup shall take effect within ninety days after initial
submission to the manufacturer or distributor and shall be presumed to be fair
and reasonable. However, the manufacturer or distributor may make reasonable
requests for additional information supporting the submission. The ninety-day
time frame in which the manufacturer or distributor shall make the declared
parts reimbursement markup effective shall commence following receipt from the
dealer of any reasonably requested supporting information. The dealer shall
not request a change in the parts reimbursement markup more than once every
twelve months.

(c) In determining qualifying repair orders
for parts, the following work shall not be included: repairs for manufacturer
or distributor special events; repairs covered by any insurance or service
contract; federal, state, or local government legislated vehicle emission or
safety inspections; parts sold at wholesale or repairs performed at wholesale,
which shall include any sale or service to a fleet of vehicles; engine
assemblies and transmission assemblies; routine maintenance not covered under
any retail customer warranty, such as fluids, filters, and belts not provided
in the course of repairs; nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not
have an individual part number; tires; and vehicle reconditioning.

(d) Dealers shall have at least thirty days
after the repair work is completed to submit a claim for approval. All claims
made by the dealers for compensation for delivery, preparation, and warranty
work shall be approved or disapproved and if approved, paid within forty-five
days after receipt by a manufacturer or distributor of a properly completed
claim. All sale incentive claims shall be approved or disapproved and if
approved, paid within sixty days after receipt by a manufacturer or distributor
of a properly completed claim. When any claim is disapproved, the dealer shall
be notified in writing of the grounds for disapproval. Failure to disapprove a
claim within the required time frame constitutes approval of the claim.

(e) A manufacturer or distributor may not
recover, or attempt to recover, from dealers its cost for reimbursing a dealer
for warranty work as required by this section.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the
director of commerce and consumer affairs shall:

(1) Conduct a review of the costs of the repairs of
motor vehicles, including the prices charged by dealers for performing repairs
under warranty and repairs not under warranty; and

(2) Compare such costs to repairs performed by
non-dealers. [L 2010, c 164, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 246, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next